dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="påt/a__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>aga</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ats</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agits</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>at</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agit</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ag</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>aget</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agets</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agen</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agens</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agna</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agnas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agne</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agnes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agna</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agnas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agna</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agnas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ades</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ogs</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ade</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>og</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oges</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oge</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ande</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agande</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>andes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agandes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ages</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ags</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ager</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ages</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>age</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mal/a__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ets</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>d</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ds</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ens</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>de</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ne</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>de</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ande</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>andes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="påta"><i>påt</i><par n="påt/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mala"><i>mal</i><par n="mal/a__vblex"/></e>
